Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1531.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 3 O.S. 2021, Section 421, as last
amended by Section 3, Chapter 237, O.S.L. 2025 (3 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 421), is amended to read as follows:
Section 421. A. The Oklahoma Department of Aerospace and
Aeronautics is hereby established as the clearinghouse for unmanned
aircraft systems (UAS) and advanced air mobility (AAM) in this state
and shall be designated as the agency of this state for the
promotion, enhancement, and development of UAS and AAM as well as
any associated infrastructure necessary to ensure the safe
integration and use of this new technology within the state. The
purpose of this clearinghouse is to create a partnership between
those entities that currently operate UAS, those that desire to use
this technology in the future, and other entities that can support
the research and development of UAS to ensure that this state can
more effectively respond to the needs of this critical sector of the

aviation and aerospace industry. In the operation of this
clearinghouse, the Department shall cooperate, assist, and
coordinate with the federal government, agencies of this state,
tribal entities, municipalities, and other persons in the
development of unmanned aircraft systems throughout the state to
ensure the acceptance of this technology and the successful
integration of UAS into the National Airspace System. Contingent
upon the availability of funds, the Oklahoma Department of Aerospace
and Aeronautics may use established program processes or may
contract with other qualified entities to carry out the duties and
responsibilities of the Unmanned Aircraft Systems Development Act of
2021.
B. The primary goal of the clearinghouse within the Department
is to establish a central point within state government to develop
and implement the strategy for how this state can become a leader in
the UAS and AAM industry. It will focus the collective resources,
knowledge, information, and assets within state government to ensure
coordinated efforts amongst all parties. The clearinghouse will
have the authority to:
1. Conduct research on what other states and localities are
doing insofar as their UAS rules and regulations so that it can
provide recommendations to ensure this state is in the best position
within the industry;
2. Organize and coordinate the application for any UAS and AAM
test site, integration opportunity, pilot program, or grant funding
on behalf of this state;
3. Maintain a registry of UAS being operated by state agencies,
except those UAS that are part of a university-affiliated research
program;
4. Maintain a registry of educational institutions that offer
training programs for users of UAS;
5. Investigate the development of, and if necessary, create a
statewide system plan that will provide the framework for the
construction, development, siting, and potential partnerships
required for vertiports and other infrastructure needed to integrate
ENR. S. B. NO. 1531 Page 2

AAM and UAS into the existing air transportation system of the
state;
6. Develop a statewide network of UAS and AAM detection systems
as necessary to support the safe integration of these technologies
into the state’s existing air transportation system; and
7. Create statewide or regional command, control, and radar
systems or centers to carry out the provisions of paragraph 6 of
this subsection and the Department’s efforts to bring UAS and AAM
testing and development to the state. These systems or centers can
be stand-alone or in partnership with other federal, state, local,
tribal, or non-profit entities;
8. Invest in publicly owned infrastructure to support the
mission of the clearinghouse and the provisions of this section; and
9. Partner and collaborate with other states and industry
stakeholders as necessary to create regional or technical centers of
excellence with an interest in integration for UAS and AAM
technologies.
C. The Department is authorized to enter into partnerships with
any city or town of this state and any county or political
subdivision or district in this state, or any public trust thereof,
or any federal government entity for the purpose of investing in and
operating infrastructure and any other items necessary to safely and
effectively integrate AAM and UAS into the existing air
transportation system of this state as well as the testing and
development of these aeronautical technologies.
D. The Department is authorized to promulgate any rules
necessary to implement the provisions of the Unmanned Aircraft
Systems Development Act of 2021.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1531 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 14th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 29th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1531 Page 4